Colorado, session 2026A, SB114.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-402, amend
(7)(a); and add (7)(d) as follows:
44-3-402. Manufacturer's license - rules.
(7) (a) (I) (A) A manufacturer of spirituous liquors licensed pursuant
to this section may conduct tastings and sell to customers spirituous liquors
of its own manufacture on its THE MANUFACTURER'S licensed premises and
at one other approved sales room location at no additional cost. A sales
room location may be included in the license at the time of the original
license issuance or by supplemental application. If the licensed premises
includes multiple noncontiguous locations, the manufacturer may operate
a sales room on only one of those noncontiguous locations.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(B) A MANUFACTURER OF SPIRITUOUS LIQUORS LICENSED PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION SHALL APPLY TO A LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY FOR
APPROVAL OF A PERMIT TO SERVE AND SELL ALCOHOL BEVERAGES ACQUIRED
FROM WHOLESALERS LICENSED IN THE STATE PURSUANT TO SECTION
44-3-407 AT THE LICENSED PREMISES AND ANY SALES ROOM APPROVED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION. EXCEPT AS
OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (7)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE
MANUFACTURER SHALL ONLY SERVE OR SELL ALCOHOL BEVERAGES
ACQUIRED FROM SUCH WHOLESALERS FOR ON-PREMISES CONSUMPTION AND
NOT FOR OFF-PREMISES CONSUMPTION OR FOR TAKEOUT AND DELIVERY
PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-911 (4)(c)(V). A MANUFACTURER MUST OBTAIN
A SEPARATE PERMIT FOR EACH LOCATION WHERE ACTIVITIES THAT ARE
AUTHORIZED BY THIS SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I)(B) OCCUR. THE ISSUANCE OF A
PERMIT BY A LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY IS SUBJECT TO SECTIONS
44-3-301 (2)(a), 44-3-311, 44-3-312, AND 44-3-313. A PERMIT ISSUED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I)(B) IS VALID FOR ONE YEAR AFTER THE
DATE OF ISSUANCE UNLESS REVOKED OR SUSPENDED PURSUANT TO SECTION
44-3-306 OR 44-3-601. THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL DETERMINE
THE FORM AND MANNER OF A PERMIT APPLICATION SUBMITTED PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I)(B).
(C) UPON APPROVAL OF A PERMIT FROM THE LOCAL LICENSING
AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION, A
MANUFACTURER OF SPIRITUOUS LIQUORS LICENSED PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION SHALL APPLY TO THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY FOR A PERMIT
TO SERVE AND SELL ALCOHOL BEVERAGES ACQUIRED FROM WHOLESALERS
LICENSED IN THIS STATE PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-407 AT THE LICENSED
PREMISES AND ANY SALES ROOM APPROVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(7)(a)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION. EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN
SUBSECTION (7)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE MANUFACTURER SHALL ONLY
SERVE OR SELL ALCOHOL BEVERAGES ACQUIRED FROM SUCH WHOLESALERS
FOR ON-PREMISES CONSUMPTION AND NOT FOR OFF-PREMISES CONSUMPTION
OR FOR TAKEOUT AND DELIVERY PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-911 (4)(c)(V).
THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL DETERMINE THE FORM AND
MANNER OF A PERMIT APPLICATION SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I)(C). IF THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY APPROVES A
PERMIT APPLICATION FILED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I)(C): THE
MANUFACTURER OF SPIRITUOUS LIQUORS SHALL HAVE SANDWICHES AND
LIGHT SNACKS AVAILABLE FOR CONSUMPTION AT ITS LICENSED PREMISES
AND ANY APPROVED SALES ROOM, BUT NEED NOT HAVE MEALS AVAILABLE
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-114

FOR CONSUMPTION; AND THE PROCEEDS DERIVED FROM SALES OF ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES ACQUIRED FROM SUCH WHOLESALERS MUST NOT EXCEED FIFTY
PERCENT OF THE MANUFACTURER'S GROSS ANNUAL REVENUE FROM ALCOHOL
BEVERAGE SALES. A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I)(C) IS
VALID UNTIL THE EXPIRATION OF THE PERMIT ISSUED BY THE LOCAL
LICENSING AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I)(B) OF THIS
SECTION OR FOR ONE YEAR AFTER THE DATE OF ISSUANCE, WHICHEVER IS
SOONER, UNLESS THE PERMIT IS REVOKED OR SUSPENDED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 44-3-306 OR 44-3-601.
(II) A manufacturer of spirituous liquors licensed pursuant to this
section that operates a sales room AND THAT DOES NOT OBTAIN A PERMIT
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTIONS (7)(a)(I)(B) AND (7)(a)(I)(C) OF THIS SECTION
FOR THE SALES ROOM TO SERVE AND SELL ALCOHOL BEVERAGES ACQUIRED
FROM WHOLESALERS LICENSED IN THIS STATE may purchase and use
common alcohol modifiers, including vermouth, amaros, and liqueurs, to
combine with spirituous liquors to produce cocktails for consumption on or
off the sales room premises. A manufacturer that uses an alcohol modifier
pursuant to this subsection (7)(a)(II) shall combine the modifier with a
spirituous liquor produced by the manufacturer. A manufacturer shall not
sell an alcohol modifier that has not been combined with a spiritous liquor.
The state licensing authority may adopt rules necessary to implement and
administer this subsection (7)(a)(II).
(d) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY ADOPT RULES TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SUBSECTION (7).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-505, add (1)(s)
and (4)(a)(VI) as follows:
44-3-505. Local license fees.
(1) The applicant shall pay the following license fees to the treasurer
of the municipality, city and county, or county where the licensed premises
is located annually in advance:
(s) FOR EACH PERMIT ISSUED TO SERVE AND SELL ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES ACQUIRED FROM WHOLESALERS LICENSED IN THE STATE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-407 AT A MANUFACTURER'S LICENSED PREMISES
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 44-3-402, FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS.
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-114

(4) (a) Each application for a license provided for in this article 3
and article 4 of this title 44 filed with a local licensing authority must be
accompanied by an application fee in an amount determined by the local
licensing authority to cover actual and necessary expenses, subject to the
following limitations:
(VI) (A) FOR A NEW PERMIT ISSUED TO SERVE AND SELL ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES ACQUIRED FROM WHOLESALERS LICENSED IN THE STATE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-407 AT A MANUFACTURER'S LICENSED PREMISES
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 44-3-402, AN AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED ONE
THOUSAND DOLLARS, SET BY THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY; AND
(B) FOR A RENEWAL APPLICATION FOR A PERMIT ISSUED TO SERVE
AND SELL ALCOHOL BEVERAGES ACQUIRED FROM WHOLESALERS LICENSED
IN THE STATE PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-407 AT A MANUFACTURER'S
LICENSED PREMISES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 44-3-402, AN AMOUNT
NOT TO EXCEED ONE HUNDRED DOLLARS, SET BY THE LOCAL LICENSING
AUTHORITY; EXCEPT THAT AN EXPIRED PERMIT RENEWAL AMOUNT MUST NOT
EXCEED FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-114

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-114